Hawaii statutes.
§261-32 Assistance for displaced person,
families, businesses and nonprofit organization. (a) The director may
compensate any person, family, business, or nonprofit organization for actual
and reasonable moving expenses incurred as a result of being displaced by any
land acquisition program of the State for any airport purpose.

(b) Any displaced person who moves from a
dwelling who elects to accept the payments authorized by this subsection in
lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (a) may receive:

(1) A moving expense allowance, determined according
to a schedule established by the director not to exceed $200;

(2) A dislocation allowance in the amount of $100.

(c) Any displaced person who moves or
discontinues the person's business or farm operations who elects to accept the
payment authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payment authorized by
subsection (a), may receive a fixed relocation payment in an amount equal to
the average annual net earnings of the business or farm operation, or $5,000,
whichever is the lesser. In the case of a business no payment shall be made
under this subsection unless the director is satisfied that the business: (1)
cannot be relocated without a substantial loss of its existing patronage; and
(2) is not part of a commercial enterprise having at least one other
establishment, not being acquired by the State which is engaged in the same or
similar business.

(d) In addition to any payments authorized in
subsection (a) and (c), the director may provide relocation assistance to any
displaced person who moves a business as a result of any land acquisition
program of the State for any airport use.

(e) The director may enter into leases,
licenses, and other arrangements with any displaced person granting the use or
occupancy of any lands or property under the department's jurisdiction. The
director may allow any lessee of a site acquired by the department to remain on
the site, and may enter into a new lease with such person granting the use of
the site; provided that the term of the new lease shall not exceed the time
remaining on the lease terminated by the acquisition. Any lease issued
pursuant to this section shall be issued through negotiation, under mutually
agreeable terms, conditions, and lease rent, without regard to the limitations
set forth in chapter 171.

(f) The director shall include the costs
specified in this section as a part of the cost of construction of the airport
for which the land acquisition program is initiated. [L 1970, c 165, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 274, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next